lt-LT: Balasto medžiaga: Smėlis; Plieniniai šratai; Vanduo; Kita
fi: Painolastin materiaali: Hiekka; Teräs; Vesi; Muu
sv: Ballastmaterial: Sand; Stålkulor; Vatten; Övrigt
ro-RO: Material de balast: Nisip; Alice de oțel; Apă; Altele
hu: Ballasztanyag: Homok; Acélhomok; Víz; Egyéb
th: วัสดุถ่วงน้ำหนัก: ทราย; แบบเม็ดเหล็ก; น้ำ; อื่นๆ
cs: Materiál zátěže: Písek; Ocelové kuličky; Voda; Jiné
en: Ballast material: Sand; Steel shot; Water; Other
pt-BR: Material do reator: Areia; Esfera de aço; Água; Outro
zh-CN: 压载材料: 沙子; 钢丸; 水; 其他
hr-HR: Materijal balasta: Pijesak; Čelična sačma; Voda; Ostalo
es: Material de lastre: Arena; Perdigones de acero; Agua; Otros
ja: バラスト材: 砂; スチールショット; 水; その他
da: Ballastmateriale: Sand; Stålskud; Vand; Andet
vi: Vật liệu dằn: Cát; Bi thép; Nước; Khác
it: Materiale di zavorra: Sabbia; Pallino d'acciaio; Acqua; Altro
de: Ballastmaterial: Sand; Stahlkugeln; Wasser; Sonstiges
fr: Matériau de lestage: Sable; Bille d’acier; Eau; Autre
sk-SK: Balastný materiál: Piesok; Oceľové broky; Voda; Iné
bg-BG: Баластен материал: Пясък; Стоманени сачми; Вода; Друго
pt-PT: Material do lastro: Areia; Granalha de aço; Água; Outro
nb: Ballastmateriale: Sand; Stålskudd; Vann; Annet
nl: Ballastmateriaal: Zand; Stalen kogels; Water; Overig
el: Υλικό έρματος: Άμμος; Ατσάλινα σφαιρίδια; Νερό; Άλλο
ko: 밸러스트 재질: 모래; 스틸 샷; 물; 기타
zh-TW: 壓載材料: 沙質; 鋼珠; 水; 其他
tr: Balast malzemesi: Kum; Çelik bilye; Su; Diğer
pl: Materiał balastowy: Piasek; Śrut stalowy; Woda; Pozostałe
sl-SI: Material obtežitve: Pesek; Jeklena krogla; Voda; Druga
ru: Материал балласта: Песок; Стальная дробь; Вода; Другой